Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1907.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 506(b)(1) of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, is amended to read:Section 506. Requests.* * *(b) Disaster or potential damage.--(1) An agency may deny a requester access:(i) when timely access is not possible due to fire, 12345678910111213141516171819202122 flood or other disaster; or(ii) to historical, ancient or rare documents, records, archives and manuscripts when access may, in the professional judgment of the curator or custodian of records, cause physical damage or irreparable harm to the record[.], including records in the State Archives which are publicly available under policies approved by the Pennsylvania Historical and Museum Commission.* * *Section 2. Section 708(b)(24) of the act is amended and the subsection is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 708. Exceptions for public records.* * *(b) Exceptions.--Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d), the following are exempt from access by a requester under this act:* * *(24) Library [archived], archives, and museum materials[,]; or valuable or rare book collections or documents contributed by gift, grant, bequest or devise, to the extent of any limitations imposed by the donor as a condition of the contribution.* * *(31) Digital reproductions, digital indices and resulting metadata or other digital work products created by a third party using public records in the possession of an agency, even if the agency possesses the digital reproductions, indices, metadata or work products, unless expressly agreed to in writing by the third party.* * *20250HB1907PN2384 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3. Section 1307(b)(2) of the act is amended to read:Section 1307. Fee limitations.* * *(b) Duplication.--* * *(2) The fees must be reasonable and based on prevailing fees for comparable duplication services for contemporary mediums provided by local business entities or the prevailing fees for comparable duplication of historical, ancient or rare documents and manuscripts.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1907PN2384 - 3 - 123456789101112